Massachusetts, session 194th, H4231.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Notwithstanding any other general or special law to the contrary:
SECTION 1. In addition to the manner prescribed in M.G.L. c. 90, §20A½, the City of
Cambridge shall be authorized to issue notices of violation of any rule, regulation, order,
ordinance or by-law regulating the parking of motor vehicles within the City’s boundaries in the
following manner:
In the event that it is not possible or safe to deliver a copy of a notice of violation to the
offender at the time and place of the violation by affixing it to the motor vehicle, said copy shall
be sent by the officer, by his commanding officer, or by any person so authorized to issue such
citations within ten days thereof, exclusive, in either case, of Sundays and holidays, to the
address of the registrant of the motor vehicle registered under the laws of this commonwealth, in
of 2

the records of the registry of motor vehicles, or, in the case of a motor vehicle registered under
the laws of another state or country, in the records of the official in such state or country having
charge of the registration of such motor vehicle. Such notice mailed by the officer, his
commanding officer, or the person so authorized, to the last address of such registrant as
appearing as aforesaid, shall be deemed as sufficient notice, and a certificate of the officer or
person so mailing such notice that it has been mailed in accordance with this section shall be
deemed prima facie evidence thereof and shall be admissible in any judicial or administrative
proceeding as to the facts contained therein.
SECTION 2. In addition to the methods prescribed in M.G.L. c. 90, §20A½ and Section 1
of this act, the City of Cambridge may also issue notices of violation through the use of
automated license plate readers (ALPR) or similar parking monitoring technologies. Photographs
or data of parking violations detected by ALPR or similar systems and transmitted to the parking
enforcement officers shall constitute “cognizance of a violation” for purposes of M.G.L. c. 90,
§20A ½ and Section 1 of this act.
SECTION 3. Issuance of notices of violation through the use of ALPR readers or similar
parking monitoring technologies shall be done in the manner prescribed for the mailing of
notices of violation as set forth in Section 1 of this act.
SECTION 4. Issuance of notices of violation through any method under this act shall
require the provision of evidence that an alleged violation occurred, in the form of photographs
of the violation, monitoring data, or other evidence of the violation from the enforcement officer
or the ALPR reader and similar parking monitoring technologies authorized under this act.
SECTION 5. This act shall take full effect upon passage.
of 2